Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-311.03
Stalking.

Any person who willfully harasses another person or a family or household member of such person with the intent to injure, terrify, threaten, or intimidate commits the offense of stalking.

Laws 1992, LB 1098, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 299, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 22.

Nebraska's stalking statutes focus both on the behavior of the perpetrator and on the experience of the victim. In re Interest of Jeffrey K., 273 Neb. 239, 728 N.W.2d 606 (2007).